West Virginia, session 2025, SB910.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 4. General Provisions. §32-4-406. Administration of chapter; operating fund for securities department. (a) This chapter shall be administered by the Auditor of this state and he or she is hereby designated, and shall be, the commissioner of securities of this state. He or she has the power and authority to appoint or employ such assistants as are necessary for the administration of this chapter.(b) The Auditor shall set up a special operating fund for the securities division in his or her office. The Auditor shall pay into the fund 20 percent 30% of all fees collected as provided for in this chapter. If, at the end of any fiscal year, the balance in the special operating fund exceeds 20 percent of the gross revenues from the special operating fund operations, the excess shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund.The special operating fund shall be used by the Auditor to fund the operation of the securities division and the general operations of the Auditor’s office. The special operating fund shall be appropriated by line item by the Legislature.(c) Moneys payable for assessments established by §32-4-407a of this code shall be collected by the commissioner and deposited into the General Revenue Fund.(d) It is unlawful for the commissioner or any of his or her officers or employees to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner and which is not made public. No provision of this chapter authorizes the commissioner or any of his or her officers or employees to disclose any information except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this chapter. No provision of the chapter either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the commissioner or any of his or her officers or employees.